Washington statutes.
RCW 5.24.060

Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

[ 1941 c 82 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 1283.]